Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 8. Fees and Charges.

Sec. 10.20.635.
Department fees.

The commissioner shall establish by regulation and charge and collect fees for filing

articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of incorporation;

articles of amendment and issuing a certificate of amendment;

restated articles of incorporation and issuing a restated certificate of incorporation;

articles of merger or consolidation and issuing a certificate of merger or consolidation;

a statement of change of address of registered office or change of registered agent, or both;

articles of dissolution;

an application of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state and issuing a certificate of authority;

an application of a foreign corporation for an amended certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state and issuing an amended certificate of authority;

a copy of an amendment to the articles of incorporation of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state;

a copy of articles of merger of a foreign corporation holding a certificate of authority to conduct affairs in this state;

an application for withdrawal of a foreign corporation and issuing a certificate of withdrawal;

any other statement or report, including a biennial report, of a domestic or foreign corporation.

The department may by regulation charge each corporation subject to this chapter a fixed fee in place of the various fees specified in this chapter and for routine administrative services rendered to the corporation by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 49 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 64 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 20 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 13 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, § 278.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 62.

Sec. 10.20.640.
Fee for certified copies of instruments.

The fee for furnishing a certified copy of any instrument shall be established by the department by regulation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 65 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.20.643.
Accounting and disposition of fees. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]